Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 4 County and Municipal Hospital Authorities
31-7-75.
Functions and powers.

Every hospital authority shall be deemed to exercise public and essential governmental functions and shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following powers:

To sue and be sued;

To have a seal and alter the same;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary to exercise the powers of the authority;

To acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise and to operate projects;

To construct, reconstruct, improve, alter, and repair projects;

To sell to others, or to lease to others for any number of years up to a maximum of 40 years, any lands, buildings, structures, or facilities constituting all or any part of any existing or hereafter established project. In the event a hospital authority undertakes to sell a hospital facility, such authority shall, prior to the execution of a contract of sale, provide reasonable public notice of such sale and provide for a public hearing to receive comments from the public concerning such sale. This power shall be unaffected by the language set forth in paragraph (13) of this Code section or any implications arising therefrom unless grants of assistance have been received by the authority with respect to such lands, buildings, structures, or facilities, in which case approval in writing as set forth in paragraph (13) of this Code section shall be obtained prior to selling or leasing to others within 20 years after completion of construction;

To lease for any number of years up to a maximum of 40 years for operation by others any project, provided that the authority shall have first determined that such lease will promote the public health needs of the community by making additional facilities available in the community or by lowering the cost of health care in the community and that the authority shall have retained sufficient control over any project so leased so as to ensure that the lessee will not in any event obtain more than a reasonable rate of return on its investment in the project, which reasonable rate of return, if and when realized by such lessee, shall not contravene in any way the mandate set forth in Code Section 31-7-77 specifying that no authority shall operate or construct any project for profit. Any lessee shall agree in the lease to pay rent sufficient in each year to pay the principal of and the interest on any revenue anticipation certificates proposed to be issued to finance the cost of the construction or acquisition of any such project and to pay off or refinance, in whole or in part, any outstanding debt or obligation of the lessee (including any redemption or prepayment premium due thereon) which was incurred in connection with the acquisition and construction of facilities of such lessee and the amount necessary in the opinion of the authority to be paid each year into any reserve funds which the authority may deem advisable to be established in connection with the retirement of the proposed revenue anticipation certificates and the maintenance of the project. Any such lease shall further provide that the cost of all insurance with respect to the project and the cost of maintenance and repair thereof shall be borne by the lessee. In carrying out a refinancing plan with regard to any outstanding debt or obligation of the lessee which was incurred in connection with the acquisition and construction of facilities of such lessee, the authority may use proceeds of any revenue anticipation certificates issued for such purpose to acquire such outstanding debt or obligation, in whole or in part, and may itself or through a fiduciary or agent hold and pledge such acquired debt or obligation as security for the payment of such revenue anticipation certificates. The powers granted in this paragraph shall be unaffected by the language set forth in paragraph (13) of this Code section or any implications arising therefrom unless grants of assistance have been received by the authority with respect to such project, in which case approval in writing as set forth in paragraph (13) of this Code section shall be obtained prior to leasing to others within 20 years after completion of construction. Any revenues derived by the authority from any such lease shall be applied by the authority to the payment of any revenue anticipation certificates issued in connection with the acquisition and construction of the project and the payment, in whole or in part, of any outstanding debt or obligation of the lessee which was incurred in connection with the acquisition and construction of facilities of such lessee (including any redemption or prepayment premium due thereon) or to the payment of any other expenses incurred in connection with acquiring, financing, maintaining, expanding, operating, or equipping the project;

To extend credit or make loans to others for the planning, design, construction, acquisition, or carrying out of any project, which credit or loans may be secured by such loan agreements, mortgages, security agreements, contracts, or other instruments or fees or charges, for a term not to exceed 40 years, and upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine reasonable in connection with such loans, including provisions for the establishment and maintenance of reserves and insurance funds, and in the exercise of powers granted by this Code section in connection with a project, to require the inclusion in any contract, loan agreement, security agreement, or other instrument such provisions for guaranty, insurance, construction, use, operation, maintenance, and financing of a project as the authority may deem necessary or desirable;

To acquire, accept, or retain equitable interests, security interests, or other interests in any property, real or personal, by mortgage, assignment, security agreement, pledge, conveyance, contract, lien, loan agreement, or other consensual transfer in order to secure the repayment of any moneys loaned or credit extended by the authority;

To establish rates and charges for the services and use of the facilities of the authority;

To accept gifts, grants, or devises of any property;

To acquire by the exercise of the right of eminent domain any property essential to the purposes of the authority;

To sell or lease within 20 years after the completion of construction of properties or facilities operated by the hospital authority where grants of financial assistance have been received from federal or state governments, after such action has first been approved by the department in writing;

To exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage, or dispose of any real or personal property or interest therein;

To mortgage, pledge, or assign any revenue, income, tolls, charges, or fees received by the authority;

To issue revenue anticipation certificates or other evidences of indebtedness for the purpose of providing funds to carry out the duties of the authority; provided, however, that the maturity of any such indebtedness shall not extend for more than 40 years;

To borrow money for any corporate purpose;

To appoint officers, agents, and employees;

To make use of any facilities afforded by the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

To receive, from the governing body of political subdivisions issuing the same, proceeds from the sale of general obligation bonds or other county obligations issued for hospital authority purposes;

To exercise any or all powers now or hereafter possessed by private corporations performing similar functions;

To make plans for unmet needs of their respective communities;

To contract for the management and operation of the project by a professional hospital or medical facilities consultant or management firm. Each such contract shall require the consultant or firm contracted with to post a suitable and sufficient bond;

To provide management, consulting, and operating services including, but not limited to, administrative, operational, personnel, and maintenance services to another hospital authority, hospital, health care facility, as said term is defined in Chapter 6 of this title, person, firm, corporation, or any other entity or any group or groups of the foregoing; to enter into contracts alone or in conjunction with others to provide such services without regard to the location of the parties to such transactions; to receive management, consulting, and operating services including, but not limited to, administrative, operational, personnel, and maintenance services from another such hospital authority, hospital, health care facility, person, firm, corporation, or any other entity or any group or groups of the foregoing; and to enter into contracts alone or in conjunction with others to receive such services without regard to the location of the parties to such transactions;

To provide financial assistance to individuals for the purpose of obtaining educational training in nursing or another health care field if such individuals are employed by, or are on an authorized leave of absence from, such authority or have committed to be employed by such authority upon completion of such educational training; to provide grants, scholarships, loans or other assistance to such individuals and to students and parents of students for programs of study in fields in which critical shortages exist in the authority’s service area, whether or not they are employees of the authority; to provide for the assumption, purchase, or cancellation of repayment of any loans, together with interest and charges thereon, made for educational purposes to students, postgraduate trainees, or the parents of such students or postgraduate trainees who have completed a program of study in a field in which critical shortages exist in the authority’s service area; and to provide services and financial assistance to private not for profit organizations in the form of grants and loans, with or without interest and secured or unsecured at the discretion of such authority, for any purpose related to the provision of health or medical services or related social services to citizens;

To exercise the same powers granted to joint authorities in subsection (f) of Code Section 31-7-72; and

To form and operate, either directly or indirectly, one or more networks of hospitals, physicians, and other health care providers and to arrange for the provision of health care services through such networks; to contract, either directly or through such networks, with the Department of Community Health to provide services to Medicaid beneficiaries to provide health care services in an efficient and cost-effective manner on a prepaid, capitation, or other reimbursement basis; and to undertake other managed health care activities; provided, however, that for purposes of this paragraph only and notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 33-3-3, as now or hereafter amended, a hospital authority shall be permitted to and shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 21 of Title 33 to the extent that such requirements apply to the activities undertaken by the hospital authority pursuant to this paragraph. No hospital authority, whether or not it exercises the powers authorized by this paragraph, shall be relieved of compliance with Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspection of public records unless otherwise authorized by law. Any health care provider licensed under Chapter 30 of Title 43 shall be eligible to apply to become a participating provider under such a hospital plan or network which provides coverage for health care services which are within the lawful scope of his or her practice, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to require any such hospital plan or network to provide coverage for any specific health care service.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 5; Ga. L. 1945, p. 349, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 116, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1805, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 15, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 103, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1970, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1140, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 712, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 310, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1391, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 901, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2003, p. 569, § 2.

Cross references.

Certificate of need required for offering of health care facilities and services, §

31-6-40

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “not for profit” was substituted for “not-for-profit” in paragraph (25).

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

For annual survey of local government law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (1983).

31-7-75.1.
Proceeds of sale of hospital held in trust to fund indigent health care.

The proceeds from any sale or lease of a hospital owned by a hospital authority or political subdivision of this state, which proceeds shall not include funds required to pay off the bonded indebtedness of the sold hospital or any expense of the authority or political subdivision attributable to the sale or lease, shall be held by the authority or political subdivision in an irrevocable trust fund. Such proceeds in that fund may be invested in the same way that public moneys may be invested generally pursuant to general law and as permitted under Code Section 31-7-83, but money in that trust fund shall be used exclusively for funding the provision of health care for the indigent residents of the political subdivision which owned the hospital or by which the authority was activated or for which the authority was created. If the funds available for a political subdivision in that irrevocable trust fund are less than $100,000.00, the principal amount may be used to fund the provision of indigent health care; otherwise, only the income from that fund may be used for that care. Such funding or reimbursement for indigent care shall not exceed the diagnosis related group rate for that hospital in each individual case.

In the event a hospital authority which sold or leased a hospital was activated by or created for more than one political subdivision or in the event a hospital having as owner more than one political subdivision is sold or leased by those political subdivisions, each such constituent political subdivision’s portion of the irrevocable trust fund for indigent health care shall be determined by multiplying the amount of that fund by a figure having a numerator which is the population of that political subdivision and a denominator which is the combined population of all the political subdivisions which owned the hospital or by which or for which the authority was activated or created.

For purposes of health care for the indigent under this Code section, the standard of indigency shall be defined as income that is at or below 138 percent of the federal poverty level based on the poverty guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

This Code section shall not apply to the following actions:

A reorganization or restructuring;

Any sale of a hospital, or the proceeds from that sale, made prior to April 2, 1986; and

Any sale or lease of a hospital when the purchaser or lessee pledges, by written contract entered into concurrently with such purchase or lease, to provide an amount of health care equal to that which would have otherwise been available pursuant to subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section for the indigent residents of the political subdivisions which owned the hospital, by which the hospital authority was activated, or for which the authority was created. However, the exception to this Code section provided by this paragraph shall only apply to:

Hospital authorities that operate a licensed hospital pursuant to a lease from the county which created the appropriate authority;

Hospitals that have a bed capacity of more than 150 beds;

Hospitals located in a county in which no other medical-surgical licensed hospital is located;

Hospitals located in a county having a population of less than 45,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990; and

Hospitals operated by a hospital authority that entered into a lease-purchase agreement between such hospital and a private corporation prior to July 1, 1997.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-75.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 744, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 739, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 3-1/HB 186; Ga. L. 2020, p. 220, § 1/SB 395.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “health care” for “hospital care” throughout this Code section; inserted “and as permitted under Code Section 31-7-83” near the middle of the second sentence of subsection (a); and deleted “and” at the end of subparagraphs (d)(3)(A) through (d)(3)(C).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “defined as income that is at or below 138 percent of the federal poverty level based on the poverty guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services” for “that determined under Code Section 31-8-43, relating to standards of indigency for emergency care of pregnant women, based upon 125 percent of the federal poverty level” in subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a hyphen was deleted from between “diagnosis” and “related” in the last sentence of subsection (a).

31-7-75.2.
Exemption from disclosure for potentially commercially valuable plan, proposal, or strategy.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no Georgia nonprofit corporation in its operation of a hospital or other medical facility for the benefit of a governmental entity in this state and no hospital authority shall be required by Chapter 14 of Title 50 or Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 to disclose or make public any potentially commercially valuable plan, proposal, or strategy that may be of competitive advantage in the operation of the corporation or authority or its medical facilities and which has not been made public. This exemption shall terminate at such time as such plan, proposal, or strategy has either been approved or rejected by the governing board of such corporation or hospital authority. Except as provided in this Code section or as otherwise provided by law, hospital authorities shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50 and Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-75.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 553, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1020, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1172, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 324 (1989).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 162 (2001).

31-7-75.3.
[Repealed] Home health agency services operated by hospitals.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-75.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 900, § 4; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 31(1)/SB 103, effective May 11, 2007.

31-7-76.
Procedure in event of failure of authority to perform minimum functions; determination of removal from office; appointments to fill vacancies created by removal.

The General Assembly declares that it is the intent of this article to provide a mechanism for the operation and maintenance of needed health care facilities in the several counties and municipalities of this state. It is the further intent of the General Assembly that, whenever an authority ceases to perform the minimum functions required for the continued operation and maintenance of needed health care facilities in the county or municipality, a procedure be made available to recognize the failure of the authority to perform these minimum functions and to provide for the orderly and responsible reorganization of the authority.

Whenever it appears that an authority has ceased to perform the minimum functions required for the continued operation and maintenance of needed health care facilities in the county or municipality in which the authority is authorized to function, a petition may be filed in the superior court in the county requesting that the members of the authority be removed from office and that any vacancy created by a removal be filled as provided in Code Section 31-7-72 for the initial appointment of members of an authority. Each such petition shall be filed by one or more residents of the county in which the authority is authorized to function, or by the county governing authority, and shall be supported by petition of a number of residents of the county equal to 5 percent or more of the number of electors registered to vote in the general election last held in the county. In the case of an authority authorized to function solely within a municipality, the petition shall be filed by one or more residents of the municipality in which the authority is authorized to function, or by the municipal governing authority, and shall be supported by petition of a number of residents of the municipality equal to 5 percent or more of the number of electors registered to vote in the general election last held in the municipality.

Upon the filing of any petition as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the judge of the superior court shall set a hearing to inquire into the merits of the petition not sooner than ten days nor later than 30 days from the date of filing of the petition. The hearing may be continued, in the discretion of the judge, on motion of any party.

At each hearing held as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the judge, sitting without a jury, shall inquire into and determine the question of whether the authority has ceased to perform the minimum functions required for the continued operation and maintenance of needed health care facilities in the county or municipality. In making his determination the judge shall consider, but shall not be limited by, whether the authority has:

Failed to establish and enforce rates and charges as provided in Code Section 31-7-77;

Failed to take any reasonable action when the failure has the effect of jeopardizing repayment of principal or interest, when due, on revenue anticipation certificates issued by the authority;

Failed to take any reasonable action when the failure has the effect of breaching a contract providing for continued maintenance and use of the authority’s facilities and entered into with a county or municipality as provided in Code Section 31-7-85;

Failed to make plans for unmet needs of the community as authorized by paragraph (22) of Code Section 31-7-75;

Failed to make and file its annual report as provided in Code Section 31-7-90;

Failed to adopt an annual budget as provided in Code Section 31-7-90;

Failed to conduct the annual audit as provided in Code Section 31-7-91;

Failed to report or publish the annual audit as provided in Code Section 31-7-92;

Failed to hold at least one meeting in the preceding calendar quarter; or

Failed to take any other action required pursuant to this article.

After giving all parties an opportunity to be heard, the judge shall determine, based on the evidence presented, whether the clear and convincing weight of the evidence is that the authority has ceased to perform the minimum functions required for the continued operation and maintenance of needed health care facilities in the county or municipality. In the event the judge so decides, he shall order the immediate removal from office of the members of the authority, except that no member shall be removed who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the judge his good faith attempt to fulfill his duties as a member of the authority. In the event the court denies the petition, the petition shall be dismissed.

Vacancies created pursuant to this Code section shall be filled in the same manner as provided in Code Section 31-7-72 for the initial appointment of members of an authority. Vacancies created by the expiration of the term or the resignation or disability of a member appointed pursuant to this Code section shall be filled as provided in Code Section 31-7-72 for the filling of vacancies.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1804.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 2009, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31.

31-7-77.
Prohibition on for-profit projects; rates and charges; utilization of revenues to pay certain obligations.

No authority shall operate or construct any project for profit. It shall fix rates and charges consistent with this declaration of policy and such as will produce revenues only in amounts sufficient, together with all other funds of the authority, to pay principal and interest on certificates and obligations of the authority, to provide for maintenance and operation of the project, and to create and maintain a reserve sufficient to meet principal and interest payments due on any certificates in any one year after the issuance thereof. The authority may provide reasonable reserves for the improvement, replacement, or expansion of its facilities or services.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section or any other provisions to the contrary, a joint hospital authority established pursuant to Code Section 31-7-72 which operates or leases a hospital containing more than 900 licensed beds shall only utilize revenues to pay principal and interest on certificates and obligations of the authority, to pay pension plan obligations of the authority existing as of January 1, 2021, and for funding projects leased by the authority to a lessee pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with paragraph (7) of Code Section 31-7-75; provided, however, that no more than 1 percent of revenues shall be utilized to pay for personnel costs for employees or contractors of the authority and no revenues shall be used to perform any power or duty delegated in a lease.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-1806, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1037, § 1/SB 62; Ga. L. 2021, p. 662, § 2/HB 370.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (b), inserted “or leases” and substituted “January 1, 2021” for “January 1, 2013” near the middle and added “and no revenues shall be used to perform any power or duty delegated in a lease” at the end.

31-7-78.
Issuance and sale of negotiable revenue anticipation certificates.

Every authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance and sale of negotiable revenue anticipation certificates for the purpose of:

Paying all or any part of the cost of the acquisition, construction, alteration, repair, modernization, and other charges incident thereto in connection with any facilities or project;

Paying all or any part of the cost of paying off or refinancing any outstanding debt or obligation of any nature owed by such authority or by persons who in furtherance of the authority’s public purposes lease facilities from such authority pursuant to this article, provided that such outstanding debt or obligation was incurred in connection with the acquisition or construction of facilities of the authority or any such lessee; and

Refunding outstanding certificates.

In addition to paying from the proceeds of any revenue anticipation certificate issue interest accrued during the construction period of any project and other incidental and customary expenses such as those for engineering, inspections, and fiscal and legal services, the authority may fund as a part of such issue and set aside from the proceeds thereof an amount of money not exceeding 15 percent of the principal amount of such issue for the purpose of establishing a debt service reserve with respect to the principal and interest requirements of such issue. The authority may issue such types of certificates as it determines appropriate, including certificates on which principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from income or revenues of the operation of the authority financed with the proceeds of such certificates or together with such proceeds and grants from the federal government, or any instrumentality, or other person or corporation in aid of such projects;

Exclusively from income and revenues of certain designated projects; or

From revenues of the authority generally, including any debt service reserve established with a portion of the certificate proceeds.

Any such certificate may be additionally secured by the hypothecation of any revenues received from participating units or subdivisions and by mortgage of the project or any part thereof constituting real or personal property of the authority, except as prohibited by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1807, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1140, § 2.

31-7-79.
Liability on revenue certificates; tax exemption.

Neither the members of an authority nor any person executing certificates on behalf of an authority shall be personally liable thereon by reason of the issuance thereof. The certificates and other obligations of an authority shall not be, and shall so state on the face thereof, a debt of the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or any combination of subdivisions acting jointly as provided in this article. Certificates of any authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxes.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1808, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Hospital Liability for Physician Negligence in Georgia: A Realistic Approach,” see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 701 (1986).

31-7-80.
Form and contents of revenue certificates; validity of signatures thereon.

Certificates of an authority shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates; mature at such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding 9 percent per annum; be in such denomination or denominations; be in such form, either coupon or registered; carry such conversion or registration privileges; have such rank or priority; be executed in such manner; be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places; and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution, its trust indenture, or mortgage may provide. In the event that any of the members or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any certificates or coupons shall cease to be such members or officers before the delivery of such certificates, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 8; Ga. L. 1957, p. 485, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1809, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 144, § 1.

Cross references.

Repeal of interest rate limitations, §

36-82-123

.

31-7-81.
Confirmation and validation of revenue certificates.

Certificates of an authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36; and, when validated, the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such certificates and against the authority issuing the same.

In the event that the payments to be made by any city or county, under contract entered into between the authority and the subdivision, are pledged to the security or payment of revenue certificates sought to be validated, the hospital authority, as an integral part of the validation proceedings, shall have a right of action against the contracting subdivision or subdivisions for a declaratory adjudication of the validity and binding effect of the contract, the actual controversy therein being whether or not the contract is in all respects valid and binding upon the subdivision or subdivisions. The subdivision or subdivisions shall be made a party or parties to the action, and it shall be incumbent on the subdivisions to defend against an adjudication of the validity of such contract or be forever bound. Notice of the proceedings shall be included in the notice of validation hearing required to be issued and published by the clerk of the superior court in which such validation proceeding is pending. Any citizen resident in any subdivision which is a party to the contract may intervene in the validation proceedings at or before the time set for the validation hearing by order of the superior court and assert any ground or objection to the validity and binding effect of the contract on his own behalf and on behalf of the subdivision and all citizens, residents, and property owners thereof. An adjudication as to the validity of the contract, unexcepted to within the time provided for exceptions in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, shall be conclusive and binding upon the subdivision or subdivisions and the resident citizens and property owners thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 12; Ga. L. 1955, p. 618, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-1810, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Venue for proceedings to confirm and validate revenue bonds issued by hospital authority, §

36-82-83

.

31-7-82.
Enforcement of rights of revenue certificate holders; procedure in event of default.

Obligations of an authority evidenced by certificates and trust indentures and mortgages executed in connection therewith may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the authority. The authority may in such instruments provide for pledging of all or any part of its gross or net fees, tolls, charges, revenues, and incomes and for mortgaging of all or any part of its real or personal property and may covenant against pledging any or all of its income, revenues, tolls, charges, or fees; and the authority may further provide for the disposition of proceeds realized from the sale of any mutilated certificates and necessary provisions as to payment and redemption of such certificates. Undertakings of an authority may likewise prescribe the procedure by which certificate holders may enforce rights against the authority and provide for such rights upon breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation of the authority. Trust indentures, mortgages, or deeds to secure debt executed by an authority may provide that, in the event of default by the authority in the payment of principal and interest on certificates or obligations or breach of any covenant, a trustee or trustees appointed under the terms of the indenture, mortgage, or deed to secure debt, which shall be a bank or trust company authorized to exercise trust powers, may take possession of and use, operate, and manage any project mortgaged as security for the repayment of any indebtedness of the authority and provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or holders of certificates may enforce any right relating to such certificates. Such trust indentures, mortgages, and deeds to secure debt may contain such provisions, not inconsistent with law, as may be deemed necessary or desirable by the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 241, § 9; Code 1933, § 88-1811, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.